Virginia statutes. Title 60.2. Unemployment Compensation.
Article 2. Benefit Computation.

§ 60.2-601.
Payment of benefits.

All benefits shall be paid through public employment offices, in accordance with such regulations as the Commission may prescribe.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-41; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-46; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-602.
Weekly benefit amount.

Beginning July 6, 2008, for claims effective on or after July 6, 2008, but before July 6, 2014, an eligible individual’s weekly “benefit amount” shall be the amount appearing in Column B in the “Benefit Table” in this section on the line on which in Column A of such table, there appears the total wages for insured work paid to such individual in the two quarters of his base period in which such total wages were highest.

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Beginning July 6, 2014, for claims effective on or after July 6, 2014, an eligible individual’s weekly “benefit amount” shall be the amount appearing in Column B in the “Benefit Table” in this section on the line on which in Column A of such table, there appears the total wages for insured work paid to such individual in the two quarters of his base period in which such total wages were highest.

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

FORM

History.

Code 1950, § 60-42; 1952, c. 184; 1954, c. 203; 1956, c. 440; 1960, c. 136; 1962, c. 12; 1964, c. 3; 1966, c. 30; 1968, c. 9; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-47; 1970, c. 104; 1972, c. 764; 1974, c. 466; 1976, c. 708; 1977, c. 330; 1978, c. 493; 1979, c. 691; 1980, c. 463; 1981, c. 606; 1984, c. 468; 1985, c. 516; 1986, cc. 480, 493; 1988, c. 131; 1990, c. 908; 1996, c. 367; 1997, cc. 530, 674; 2000, c. 573; 2002, cc. 122, 892; 2003, c. 926; 2005, cc. 23, 918; 2006, c. 258; 2007, c. 628; 2008, c. 725; 2009, c. 789; 2010, c. 412; 2011, c. 16; 2012, c. 312.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 573, effective retroactive to November 28, 1999, substituted “November 28, 1999” for “July 2, 2000” in two places, substituted “November 28, 1999” for “July 1, 2000” in the first paragraph, and added table listings for weekly benefit amounts of 233 through 268.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 122 and 892 are identical and, effective retroactively to September 9, 2001, in subsection A, substituted “September 9, 2001, and expiring January 1, 2003” for “November 28, 1999” at the beginning of the first sentence, substituted “September 9, 2001, and for claims for which a claimant had established a benefit year as of September 9, 2001” for “November 28, 1999” in the middle of the first sentence, and deleted the former second paragraph, which read: “For claims filed prior to November 28, 1999, an eligible individual’s weekly ‘benefit amount’ shall be computed under the provisions of this section in force on the date such claim was filed,” and increased the weekly benefit amount as set out in Column B of the table immediately following the text of subsection A; and added subsections B and C.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 926 substituted “January 5, 2003” for “January 1, 2003” in subsection A; in subsection B, twice substituted “January 5, 2003” for “January 1, 2003,” and substituted “July 6, 2003” for “January 1, 2004”; in subsection C, substituted “July 6, 2003” for “January 1, 2004,” substituted “July 6, 2003 but before July 4, 2004” for “January 1, 2004,” and added entries beginning
at “13450.01” through the end to the benefits table; and added subsection D and its benefit table.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 23 deleted subsections A through C which referred to obsolete benefit tables; and deleted the subsection D designator.

The 2005 amendment by c. 918 inserted “but before July 3, 2005” in the introductory paragraph of subsection A; and added subsection B.

This section is set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 258 deleted former subsection A which referred to obsolete benefit tables, redesignated former subsection B as present subsection A, and added subsection B.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 628 inserted “but before July 1, 2007” in subsection B; and added subsection C.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 725 inserted “but before July 6, 2008” following “after July 1, 2007” in subsection C, and added subsections D and E.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 789 substituted “July 4, 2010” for “July 5, 2009” in subsection D and twice in subsection E.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 412 deleted former subsections A through C and redesignated D and E accordingly.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 16 substituted “July 1, 2012” for “July 3, 2011” in the introductory paragraph of subsections A and B.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 312 substituted “July 6, 2014” for “July 1, 2012” in the introductory paragraph of subsections A and B.

§ 60.2-603.
Weekly benefit for unemployment.

Each eligible individual who is unemployed in any week shall be paid for such week a benefit equal to his weekly benefit amount less any part of the wages payable to him for such week which is in excess of $50. Where such excess is not a multiple of $1, it shall be computed to the next highest multiple of $1.

Wages earned on a shift commencing Saturday and ending Sunday shall be allocated to the week in which the claimant earns the majority of wages for such work.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-43; 1964, c. 3; 1966, c. 30; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-48; 1970, c. 104; 1984, cc. 458, 468; 1986, c. 480; 1992, c. 482; 2005, c. 125.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 125, in subsection A, substituted “$50” for “twenty-five dollars” in the first sentence and substituted “$1” for “one dollar” twice in the second sentence.

§ 60.2-604.
Reduction of benefit amount by amount of pension.

The weekly benefit amount payable to an individual for any week which begins in a period for which such individual is receiving a governmental or other pension, retirement or retired pay, annuity, or any other similar periodic payment under a plan maintained or contributed to by a base period or chargeable employer based on the previous work of such individual, including payments received by such individual in accordance with §

65.2-500

or

65.2-502

, shall be reduced, but not below zero, by an amount equal to the amount of such pension, retirement or retired pay, annuity, or other payment, which is reasonably attributable to such week; however, in consideration of the employee’s contributions thereto, the weekly benefit amount payable to an individual for any week shall not be reduced by any amount of Social Security Act or Railroad Retirement Act retirement benefits received by such individual and attributable to such week.

History.

1977, c. 330, § 60.1-48.1; 1978, c. 269; 1986, c. 480; 1987, c. 3; 2003, cc. 534, 555; 2005, c. 1; 2011, cc. 748, 751.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 534 and 555 are identical, and inserted “except that the weekly benefit amount payable to an individual for any week shall be reduced, but not below zero, by an amount equal to 50 percent of Social Security Act or Railroad Retirement Act retirement benefits received by such individual and attributable to such week” at the end of the section.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 1 inserted “(i) where the fund balance factor determined pursuant to subsection A of §

60.2-533

is below 50 percent, effective the first Sunday in January following the determination of the fund balance factor,” added clause (ii), and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 748 and 751 are identical, and substituted “however, in consideration of the employee’s contributions thereto” for “except that (i) where the fund balance factor determined pursuant to subsection A of §

60.2-533

is below 50 percent, effective the first Sunday in January following the determination of the fund balance factor, the weekly benefit amount payable to an individual for any week shall be reduced, but not below zero, by an amount equal to 50 percent of Social Security Act or Railroad Retirement Act benefits received by such individual and attributable to such week or (ii) where the fund balance factor determined pursuant to subsection A of §

60.2-533

meets or exceeds 50 percent, effective the first Sunday in January following the determination of the fund balance factor.”

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on governmental services and social welfare for the year 1976-1977, see 63 Va. L. Rev. 1440 (1977).

§ 60.2-605.
Benefit rights based on benefit year.

Benefit rights of individuals shall be based solely upon the benefit year as defined in §

60.2-206

.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-44; 1960, c. 136; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-49; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-606.
Benefits when wages irregular.

If the remuneration payable to an individual is not based upon a fixed period or duration of time or if the individual’s wages are payable at irregular intervals or in such manner as not to extend regularly over the period of employment, the wages for any week or for any calendar quarter for the purpose of computing an individual’s right to unemployment benefits only shall be determined in such manner as may by regulation be prescribed. Such regulations shall, so far as possible, secure results reasonably similar to those which would prevail if the individual’s wages were payable at regular intervals.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-45.1; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-50; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-607.
Maximum total benefit amounts.

The maximum total amount of benefits payable to any individual during any benefit year shall be determined from the “Benefit Table” shown in §

60.2-602

but shall not exceed twenty-six times such individual’s weekly benefit amount, except when benefits are paid pursuant to the provisions of §

60.2-610

or §

60.2-611

. Such determination shall be based only upon wages paid for insured work during such individual’s base period. The Commission shall maintain a separate account for each individual who is paid wages for insured work. After the expiration of each calendar quarter the Commission shall credit each individual’s account with the wages paid to him for insured work in such calendar quarter.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-45.2; 1956, c. 440; 1960, c. 136; 1962, c. 12; 1964, c. 3; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-51; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 235; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-608.
Child support intercept of unemployment benefits.

Any individual filing a new claim for unemployment compensation shall, at the time of filing such claim, disclose whether or not the individual owes child support obligations as defined under subsection G of this section. If any such individual discloses that he or she owes child support obligations, and is determined to be eligible for unemployment compensation, the Commission shall notify the state or local child support enforcement agency enforcing such obligation that the individual has been determined to be eligible for unemployment compensation.

The Commission shall deduct and withhold the following from any unemployment compensation payable to such an individual:

The amount specified by the individual to the Commission to be deducted and withheld under this subsection, if neither the provisions of subdivision 2 of this subsection nor the provisions of subdivision 3 of this subsection are applicable;

The amount, if any, determined pursuant to an agreement submitted to the Commission under § 454 (20) (B) (i) of the Social Security Act by the state or local child support enforcement agency, unless the provisions of subdivision 3 of this subsection are applicable; or

Any amount otherwise required to be so deducted and withheld from such unemployment compensation pursuant to legal process, as defined in § 462 (e) of the Social Security Act, properly served upon the Commission.

Any amount deducted and withheld under subsection B shall be paid by the Commission to the appropriate state or local child support enforcement agency.

Any amount deducted and withheld under subsection B shall be treated as if it were paid to the individual as unemployment compensation and paid by such individual to the state or local child support enforcement agency in satisfaction of the individual’s child support obligations.

For purposes of subsections A through D of this section, “unemployment compensation” means any compensation payable under this title, including amounts payable by the Commission pursuant to an agreement under any federal law providing for compensation, assistance, or allowances with respect to unemployment.

This section applies only if appropriate arrangements have been made for reimbursement by the state or local child support enforcement agency for the administrative costs incurred by the Commission under this section which are attributable to child support obligations being enforced by the state or local child support enforcement agency.

The term “child support obligations” as defined for purposes of this section includes only obligations which are being enforced pursuant to a plan described in § 454 of the Social Security Act which has been approved by the Secretary of Health and Human Services under Part D of Title IV (42 U.S.C. 651 et seq.) of the Social Security Act.

The term “state or local child support enforcement agency” as used in this section means any agency of any state or a political subdivision thereof operating pursuant to a plan described in subsection G of this section.

History.

1982, c. 237, § 60.1-52.6; 1986, c. 480.

Cross references.

As to remedies for delinquency in support obligations, including attachment of unemployment benefits and workers’ compensation benefits and suspension of an individual’s driver’s license, see §

63.2-1941

.

§ 60.2-608.1.
Deduction and withholding of federal income tax.

For all payments made after December 31, 1996, federal income tax may be deducted and withheld from a benefit payment if the individual receiving such benefits voluntarily requests such deduction and withholding. The deduction shall be an amount equal to fifteen percent of such payment, or the amount determined by the Internal Revenue Service.

Any amount deducted and withheld under subsection A of this section shall remain in the Unemployment Compensation Fund until transferred to the Internal Revenue Service as a payment of income tax.

Any amount deducted and withheld under subsection A of this section shall be treated as if it were paid to the individual as unemployment benefits.

Amounts shall be deducted and withheld under this section only after amounts are deducted and withheld for any unemployment benefit overpayments, child support obligations, or any other amounts required to be deducted and withheld under this title.

The Commission shall follow all procedures specified by the United States Department of Labor and the Internal Revenue Service pertaining to the deducting and withholding of federal income tax from unemployment benefits.

History.

1996, c. 107.

§ 60.2-608.2.
Withholding of benefits; food stamp overissuance.

Any individual filing a new claim for unemployment compensation shall, at the time of filing such claim, disclose whether or not the individual owes an uncollected overissuance of food stamp coupons, as such is defined in § 13(c) (1) of the Food Stamp Act of 1977, 7 U.S.C. § 2022(c) (1). If any such individual discloses that he or she owes food stamp obligations and is determined to be eligible for unemployment compensation, the Commission shall notify the state food stamp agency enforcing such obligation that the individual has been determined to be eligible for unemployment compensation.

The Commission shall deduct and withhold the following from any unemployment compensation payable to an individual who owes an uncollected overissuance:

The amount specified by the individual to the Commission to be deducted and withheld under this subsection, if neither the provisions of subdivision 2 nor the provisions of subdivision 3 of this subsection are applicable; or

The amount, if any, determined pursuant to an agreement submitted to the Commission by the state food stamp agency under § 13(c) (3) (A) of the Food Stamp Act of 1977, 7 U.S.C. § 2022 (c) (3) (A); or

Any amount otherwise required to be so deducted and withheld from such unemployment compensation pursuant to § 13(c) (3) (B) of the Food Stamp Act of 1977, 7 U.S.C. § 2022(c) (3) (B).

Any amount deducted and withheld under subsection B shall be paid by the Commission to the appropriate state food stamp agency.

Any amount deducted and withheld under subsection B shall for all purposes be treated as if it were paid to the individual as unemployment compensation and paid by such individual to the state food stamp agency as repayment of the individual’s uncollected overissuance.

For purposes of subsections A through D of this section, the term “unemployment compensation” means any compensation payable under this title including amounts payable by the Commission pursuant to an agreement under any federal law providing for compensation, assistance, or allowances with respect to unemployment.

The provisions of this section shall be applicable only if appropriate arrangements have been made for reimbursement by the state food stamp agency for the administrative costs incurred by the Commission under this subsection which are attributable to the repayment of uncollected overissuances to the state food stamp agency.

History.

1997, c. 385.

§ 60.2-609.
Reciprocal arrangements with agencies of other states or federal government.

The Commission shall participate in any arrangements for the payment of compensation on the basis of combining an individual’s wages and employment covered under the unemployment compensation laws of two or more states. Such arrangements shall be approved by the United States Secretary of Labor, in consultation with the state unemployment compensation agencies, to assure the prompt and full payment of compensation in such situations. Such arrangements include provisions for:
A. 1. The Commission shall participate in any arrangements for the payment of compensation on the basis of combining an individual’s wages and employment covered under the unemployment compensation laws of two or more states. Such arrangements shall be approved by the United States Secretary of Labor, in consultation with the state unemployment compensation agencies, to assure the prompt and full payment of compensation in such situations. Such arrangements include provisions for:

Applying the base period of a single state law to a claim involving the combining of an individual’s wages and employment covered under two or more state unemployment compensation laws, and

Avoiding the duplicate use of wages and employment by reason of such combining.

Amounts paid under such reciprocal arrangement by another state agency on behalf of the Commission shall, when reimbursed by the Commission, be chargeable to the same accounts and in the same amounts as if such benefits had been paid without regard to such reciprocal arrangement.

Amounts paid under any such reciprocal arrangement by the Commission on behalf of another state agency shall be chargeable to the Commission’s benefit account fund and the corresponding reimbursements shall be credited to the same account.

2.

The Commission shall periodically reimburse any other state agency, up to the amount of benefit credits thus transferred to it by the Commission for payments actually made by such other state agency based on such transfers.

3.

Similarly, such other state agency shall periodically reimburse the Commission, for payments it actually made based on the benefit credits transferred to it by such other state agency.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-47.1; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-59; 1970, c. 104; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 235; 1979, c. 675; 1986, c. 480.